Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General 
Laws, chapter 131 of the acts of 2022 or any other general or special law to the contrary, the 
Commissioner of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance may release or amend certain use 
restrictions (use restricted to nonprofit recreational, educational or community use and any 
ancillary uses) held by the Commonwealth  on the parcel of land and building situated thereon at 
89 Summer street in the City of Malden, formerly the site of Malden district court and 0 Summer 
Street, used as a district court parking lot.  The use restrictions are described in the deed recorded 
in the Middlesex Southern Registry of Deeds book 82021, page 277 and shown on a plan entitled 
“Existing Conditions Plan of Land Malden District Court 89 Summer Street in Malden 

of 2 10 Massachusetts” prepared by BSC Group and recoded with the Middlesex Southern Registry of 
Deeds at Book 2023, Page 628.  The consideration for the release or amendment of the use 
restrictions for all other proposed sale/reuses shall be determined by the Commissioner of 
Capital Asset Management in consultation with the Mayor of Malden and the Net Proceeds shall 
be paid to the Commonwealth at the time of a subsequent conveyance to a third party for 
development. 
SECTION 2. The Net Proceeds shall be determined as the difference between the sale 
price from the City of Malden to a third party developer and the purchase price of $480,000 as 
paid for by the City of Malden in 2023, minus costs related to release or amendment of the 
restriction and sale/redevelopment transaction related costs, including, but not limited to, 
appraisals, surveys, plans, recordings, professional fees and studies and other reasonable 
expenses necessary to effectuate the release, amendment, and subsequent disposition.  In the 
event that the net proceeds is a negative amount, the Commonwealth shall not be required to 
make any payments to the City of Malden.